Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1536.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 221 of Title 74, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Entity” means any person, association, corporation, or


other organization, whether incorporated or unincorporated,


operating within this state;

Req. No. 3554 Page 1


2. “Foreign terrorist organization” means an organization


currently designated by the United States Secretary of State


pursuant to 8 U.S.C., Section 1189;


3. “Material support or resources” has the same meaning as in


U.S.C., Section 2339A(b) and includes, but is not limited to,


currency, financial services, training, expert advice or assistance,


or any tangible or intangible property or service provided in


coordination with or under the direction or control of a foreign


terrorist organization; and


4. “Muslim Brotherhood” means the organization founded in Egypt


in 1928, its global network, and any successor or splinter entities


that adhere to its ideology and strategic goals. A domestic


reference point is the Department of Justice’s list of two hundred


forty-six unindicted co-conspirators in the Holy Land Foundation


criminal case.


B. 1. When the Attorney General has reasonable cause to


believe an entity is engaged in fraudulent charitable solicitation


that benefits a foreign terrorist organization, is providing


material support or resources to a foreign terrorist organization,


is misrepresenting the nature of its relationship with or support


for the unlawful activities of the foreign terrorist organization,


or is encouraging violence, the Attorney General may exercise all


existing civil investigative powers, including civil investigative


demands under state consumer-protection and false-claims statutes.

Req. No. 3554 Page 2


2. Such investigations can include examination of financial


records, communications, foreign funding sources, ties to foreign


terrorist organizations and other international extremist networks,


and any other evidence relevant to determining potential consumer


fraud committed by misrepresentation of the organization’s true


purposes and activities.


3. The Attorney General shall have all existing statutory


powers of investigation, including civil investigative demands and


subpoena power, and is further authorized to employ advanced


investigative tools, forensic accounting, data analytics, and open-


source intelligence tools necessary to identify concealed


connections and funding streams, provided there is reasonable


suspicion of illicit activity.


4. The Attorney General shall have the power to investigate


entity directors who directed, approved, or otherwise were complicit


in fraudulent activities, as well as assess fines and other


penalties on directors who fail to comply with subpoena requests.


5. The Attorney General shall establish clear internal


guidelines governing the scope and duration of such investigations


which shall be conducted in full compliance with state and federal


law and in coordination with the Governor’s office as necessary.


6. District attorneys shall, whenever appropriate based on


reasonable findings, collaborate with the Attorney General in



Req. No. 3554 Page 3


initiating formal criminal investigations and pursue their own


criminal proceedings when relevant under state law.


7. The Attorney General shall ensure that the state’s


mechanisms for reporting consumer fraud include appropriate


protections for whistleblowers.


C. 1. After investigation, if the Attorney General believes an


entity has knowingly provided material support to a foreign


terrorist organization, encouraged violence, or engaged in a pattern


of misrepresentation, deceit, or fraudulent solicitation to the


detriment of public consumers and the benefit of a foreign terrorist


organization, the Attorney General shall formally notify the


Governor that the entity is a Designated Terrorist Support Entity,


publish the notice on the Attorney General’s website, and transmit


the notice to all state agencies.


2. The Attorney General may also file a civil action, pursuant


to the state’s consumer fraud protection statutes, seeking an


injunction to shut down the fraudulent solicitation or deceptive


charity, and seeking restitution and civil penalties when


appropriate.


3. The Designated Terrorist Support Entity shall be denied all


state funds provided by any state agency beginning with the state


fiscal year that starts after the date on which a final judicial


determination has been issued in the action brought by the Attorney


General pursuant to paragraph 2 of this subsection. No public

Req. No. 3554 Page 4


university, community college, school district, or other recipient


of state funds shall, after the date of the final judicial


determination, knowingly provide any grant, contract, loan, tax


credit, tax exemption, or other state financial benefit to a


Designated Terrorist Support Entity.


4. The Attorney General shall alert all state agencies and


offices about the designation made pursuant to paragraph 1 of this


subsection, to help protect public consumers and prevent official


collaboration with an organization believed to be committing


consumer fraud or supporting illicit activities.


5. This section does not prohibit transactions necessary to


comply with federal law or court order, nor does it prohibit purely


expressive activities protected by the First Amendment to the United


States Constitution.


D. On or before December 31 of each year, the Attorney General


shall electronically submit to the Governor and Legislature a public


report summarizing investigations conducted, designations issued,


judicial actions filed, and amounts of fraudulently solicited funds


recovered or prevented. The report shall redact information that


would compromise ongoing investigations.


E. 1. The Department of Public Safety, in consultation with


the Attorney General and the Governor, shall provide an educational


module on foreign terrorist organizations, including Muslim


Brotherhood networks, and how they exploit America’s open society,

Req. No. 3554 Page 5


particularly tax-exempt charitable privileges, to fundraise and


encourage violence. The module shall train law enforcement to


recognize and investigate such behavior, and draw upon relevant


federal statutes and case law.


2. Every certified peace officer and reserve peace officer in


the state, under the authority of the Attorney General and the


Governor, shall complete this training module at least once every


three (3) years as part of the Council on Law Enforcement Education


and Training’s continuing education requirements. Those who receive


training shall include officers serving schools and universities as


well as corrections officers and sheriffs.


SECTION 2. There is hereby appropriated to the Office of the


Attorney General from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the


General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year


ending June 30, 2027, the sum of One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00)


or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed


upon the Office of the Attorney General by law.


SECTION 3. There is hereby appropriated to the Office of the


Governor from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the General


Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year ending June


30, 2027, the sum of Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars


($250,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform the


duties imposed upon the Office of the Governor by law.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.

Req. No. 3554 Page 6


SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3554 BLB 1/12/2026 3:53:21 PM





































Req. No. 3554 Page 7